District of Columbia statutes.
41-115

Contents of safe deposit box or other safekeeping repository.

Except as provided in § 30-103, all personal property, tangible or intangible, held in a safe deposit box or any other safekeeping repository in the District by any person in the ordinary course of business, which is unclaimed by the owner for 3 years or more from the date on which the lease or rental period on the box or other repository expired is presumed abandoned.

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-160, § 115, 27 DCR 5150
Sept. 29, 1992, D.C. Law 9-161, § 2(l), 39 DCR 5696
Mar. 20, 1998, D.C. Law 12-60, § 1701(j), 44 DCR 7378
1981 Ed., § 42-215.
Section 1701(j) of D.C. Law 12-59 substituted “3 years” for “5 years.”
Section 2001(b) of D.C. Law 12-59 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 1701(j) of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-152, October 17, 1997, 44 DCR 6196), and see § 1701(j) of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-239, January 13, 1998, 45 DCR 508).
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 16 of the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act (1981 Act).